ro-RO: Construcția anvelopei: Pliuri înclinate; Radial; Solid; Altele
ja: タイヤの構造: バイアス; ラジアル; ソリッド; その他
cs: Provedení pneumatiky: Diagonální; Radiální; Plné; Jiné
hu: Gumiabroncs szerkezete: Diagonális; Radiális; Tömör; Egyéb
sl-SI: Konstrukcija pnevmatike: Diagonalna ploskev; Radialni; Trden; Druga
da: Dækkonstruktion: Bias-ply; Radial; Solid; Andet
bg-BG: Конструкция на гумата: Диагонални гуми; Радиални; Плътно; Друго
fr: Construction du pneu: Carcasse diagonale; Radial; Solide; Autre
zh-TW: 輪胎結構: 斜交胎; 輻射層; 實心胎; 其他
nl: Bandenconstructie: Diagonaalband; Radiaal; Volrubber; Overig
pt-BR: Construção do pneu: Lona cruzada; Radial; Maciço; Outro
sv: Däckkonstruktion: Bias-ply; Radiell; Solid; Annat
lt-LT: Padangos konstrukcija: Įstrižinio kordų pynimo; Radialinė; Kieta; Kita
nb: Dekkkonstruksjon: Skrålag; Radial; Fast; Annet
fi: Renkaan rakenne: Ristikudos; Säteittäinen; Kiinteä; Muu
tr: Lastik yapısı: Çapraz katlı; Radyal; Dolgu; Diğer
pt-PT: Construção do pneu: Diagonal; Radial; Sólido; Outro
ko: 타이어 구조: 바이어스; 방사형; 솔리드; 기타
zh-CN: 轮胎结构: 斜交; 子午线; 实心; 其他
it: Costruzione dello pneumatico: Diagonale; Radiale; Solido; Altro
hr-HR: Izrada guma: Dijagonalni sloj; Radijalan; Čvrsti; Ostalo
en: Tire construction: Bias-ply; Radial; Solid; Other
ru: Конструкция шины: Диагональная; Радиальная; Цельнолитая; Другая
pl: Konstrukcja opony: Diagonalne; Radialne; Pełne; Inne
th: โครงสร้างของยางรถยนต์: ไบแอสพลาย; แบบรัศมี; แผ่นตัน; อื่นๆ
vi: Kết cấu lốp xe: Lốp bố chéo; Hình tia; Lốp rắn; Khác
el: Κατασκευή ελαστικού: Διαγώνιας κατασκευής; Ακτινωτό; Συμπαγές; Άλλο
es: Construcción del neumático: Capa diagonal; Radial; Sólido; Otros
de: Reifenkonstruktion: Diagonal; Radial; Solide; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Konštrukcia pneumatiky: Diagonálna; Radiálna; Pevná; Iné